Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2383
Local hospital district; secretary-treasurer; prohibited acts; violation; penalty; liability on bond.

The making of profit, directly or indirectly, by the secretary-treasurer out of any money in the local hospital district treasury belonging to the local hospital district, the custody of which the secretary-treasurer is charged with, by loaning or depositing or otherwise using or depositing the same in any manner, or the removal by the secretary-treasurer or by his or her consent of such money or a part thereof out of the vault of the secretary-treasurer's department or any legal depository of such money, except for the payment of warrants legally drawn or for the purpose of depositing the same in the banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions selected as depositories under the provisions of sections 77-2369 to 77-2385, shall be deemed a Class IV felony, and the secretary-treasurer shall also be liable under and upon his or her official bond for all profits realized from such unlawful using of such funds.

Laws 1994, LB 1118, § 15;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 80.